Utah statutes.
53A-11-1305.   Board rules to ensure protection of individual rights.

The State Board of Education and local boards of education shall adopt rules to implement this part.  The rules shall establish procedures to ensure protection of individual rights against excessive and unreasonable intrusion.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

